Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 11 TLSB 2212XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 113 Section 1. Section 256.11, subsections 2, 3, 4, 9, and 19, 1 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 2. The kindergarten program shall include experiences 3 designed to develop healthy emotional and social habits and 4 growth in the language arts and communication skills, as well 5 as a capacity for the completion of individual tasks, and 6 protect and increase physical well-being with attention given 7 to experiences relating to the development of life skills and , 8 subject to section 279.80 , age-appropriate and research-based 9 human growth and development. A kindergarten teacher shall be 10 licensed to teach in kindergarten. An accredited nonpublic 11 school must meet the requirements of this subsection only if 12 the nonpublic school offers a kindergarten program ; provided, 13 however, that section 279.80 shall not apply to a nonpublic 14 school . 15 3. The following areas shall be taught in grades one through 16 six: English-language arts, social studies, mathematics, 17 science, health, physical education, traffic safety, music, 18 visual art, and , subject to section 279.80 , age-appropriate and 19 research-based human growth and development. Computer science 20 instruction incorporating the standards established under 21 section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), 22 shall be offered in at least one grade level commencing with 23 the school year beginning July 1, 2023. The health curriculum 24 shall include the characteristics of communicable diseases 25 including acquired immune deficiency syndrome . The state board 26 as part of accreditation standards shall adopt curriculum 27 definitions for implementing the elementary program. 28 4. The following shall be taught in grades seven and 29 eight: English-language arts; social studies, including 30 instruction related to civics; mathematics; science; 31 health; age-appropriate and research-based human growth and 32 development; career exploration and development; physical 33 education; music; and visual art. Computer science instruction 34 incorporating the standards established under section 256.7, 35 -1- LSB 2212XS (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 9 S.F. 113 subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), shall be 1 offered in at least one grade level commencing with the 2 school year beginning July 1, 2023. Career exploration 3 and development shall be designed so that students are 4 appropriately prepared to create an individual career 5 and academic plan pursuant to section 279.61 , incorporate 6 foundational career and technical education concepts aligned 7 with the six career and technical education service areas as 8 defined in subsection 5 , paragraph âhâ , incorporate relevant 9 twenty-first century skills to facilitate career readiness, 10 and introduce students to career opportunities within the 11 local community and across this state. The health curriculum 12 shall include age-appropriate and research-based information 13 regarding the characteristics of sexually transmitted diseases , 14 including human papilloma virus, as defined by the centers for 15 disease control and prevention of the United States department 16 of health and human services, and the availability of a 17 vaccine to prevent the human papilloma virus, and acquired 18 immune deficiency syndrome . The state board as part of 19 accreditation standards shall adopt curriculum definitions for 20 implementing the program in grades seven and eight. However, 21 this subsection shall not apply to the teaching of career 22 exploration and development in nonpublic schools. 23 9. a. (1) Beginning July 1, 2023, each school district 24 shall employ either a qualified teacher librarian licensed 25 by the board of educational examiners or a person previously 26 employed as a librarian by a public library. The board of 27 educational examiners shall not require an applicant for a 28 teacher librarian license to have a masterâs degree. 29 (2) Each school district shall establish a kindergarten 30 through grade twelve library program that is consistent with 31 section 280.6 and with the educational standards established 32 in this section, contains only age-appropriate materials, and 33 supports the student achievement goals of the total school 34 curriculum. 35 -2- LSB 2212XS (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 9 S.F. 113 (3) If, after investigation, the department determines 1 that a school district or an employee of a school district has 2 violated the provisions of subparagraph (2) related to library 3 programs containing only age-appropriate materials, beginning 4 January 1, 2024, the school district or employee of the school 5 district, as applicable, shall be subject to the following: 6 (a) For the first violation of subparagraph (2), the 7 department shall issue a written warning to the board 8 of directors of the school district or the employee, as 9 applicable. 10 (b) (i) For a second or subsequent violation of 11 subparagraph (2), if the department finds that a school 12 district knowingly violated subparagraph (2), the 13 superintendent of the school district shall be subject to 14 a hearing conducted by the board of educational examiners 15 pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 13 , which may result 16 in disciplinary action. 17 (ii) For a second or subsequent violation of subparagraph 18 (2), if the department finds that an employee of the school 19 district who holds a license, certificate, authorization, or 20 statement of recognition issued by the board of educational 21 examiners knowingly violated subparagraph (2), the employee 22 shall be subject to a hearing conducted by the board of 23 educational examiners pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 24 13 , which may result in disciplinary action. 25 b. The state board shall establish in rule standards for 26 school district library programs, which shall be designed to 27 provide for methods to improve library collections to meet 28 student needs, include a current and diverse collection of 29 fiction and nonfiction materials in a variety of formats 30 to support student curricular needs, and include a plan 31 for annually updating and replacing library materials and 32 equipment. 33 c. The state board shall establish in rule a definition 34 of and standards for an articulated sequential kindergarten 35 -3- LSB 2212XS (2) 91 jda/jh 3/ 9 S.F. 113 through grade twelve media program. 1 d. A school district that entered into a contract with an 2 individual for employment as a media specialist or librarian 3 prior to June 1, 2006, shall be considered to be in compliance 4 with this subsection until June 30, 2011, if the individual 5 is making annual progress toward meeting the requirements 6 for a teacher librarian endorsement issued by the board of 7 educational examiners. 8 19. For purposes of this section : 9 a. (1) âAge-appropriateâ means topics, messages, and 10 teaching methods suitable to particular ages or age groups 11 of children and adolescents, based on developing cognitive, 12 emotional, and behavioral capacity typical for the age or age 13 group. âAge-appropriateâ does not include any material with 14 descriptions or visual depictions of a sex act as defined in 15 section 702.17 . 16 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for purposes of the 17 human growth and development curriculum, âage-appropriateâ means 18 the same as defined in section 279.50 . 19 b. âResearch-basedâ means the same as defined in section 20 279.50 . 21 Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph j, 22 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 (1) One unit of health education which may include personal 24 health; food and nutrition; environmental health; safety and 25 survival skills; consumer health; family life; age-appropriate 26 and research-based human growth and development; substance 27 use disorder and nonuse; emotional and social health; health 28 resources; cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and prevention 29 and control of disease, including age-appropriate and 30 research-based information regarding sexually transmitted 31 diseases , including human papilloma virus, as defined by the 32 centers for disease control and prevention of the United States 33 department of health and human services, and the availability 34 of a vaccine to prevent the human papilloma virus, and acquired 35 -4- LSB 2212XS (2) 91 jda/jh 4/ 9 S.F. 113 immune deficiency syndrome . 1 Sec. 3. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraphs n, o, and 2 p, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 3 Sec. 4. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, paragraphs l, m, and 4 n, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 5 Sec. 5. Section 279.50, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2025, are 6 amended to read as follows: 7 1. Subject to section 279.80 , each Each school board shall 8 provide instruction in kindergarten which gives attention 9 to experiences relating to life skills and human growth and 10 development as required in section 256.11 . School districts 11 shall use research provided in section 256.9, subsection 46 , 12 paragraph âbâ , to evaluate and upgrade their instructional 13 materials and teaching strategies for human growth and 14 development. 15 2. Subject to section 279.80 , each Each school board shall 16 provide age-appropriate and research-based instruction in 17 human growth and development including instruction regarding 18 self-esteem, stress management, interpersonal relationships, 19 and domestic abuse , the human papilloma virus, as defined by 20 the centers for disease control and prevention of the United 21 States department of health and human services, and the 22 availability of a vaccine to prevent the human papilloma virus, 23 and acquired immune deficiency syndrome, in grades one through 24 six. 25 Sec. 6. Section 279.76, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 26 2025, is amended to read as follows: 27 a. Each school district is prohibited from administering 28 or conducting an invasive physical examination of a student, 29 a student health screening that is not required by state or 30 federal law, or a formal examination or survey of a student 31 that is designed to assess the studentâs mental, emotional, or 32 physical health that is not required by state or federal law, 33 without first acquiring the written consent of the studentâs 34 parent or guardian. This section applies only to a minor child 35 -5- LSB 2212XS (2) 91 jda/jh 5/ 9 S.F. 113 in the direct care of a parent or guardian, and does not apply 1 to an emancipated minor or a minor who is not residing with the 2 parent or guardian. 3 Sec. 7. Section 299A.9, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 1. A child of compulsory attendance age who is identified 6 as requiring special education under chapter 256B is eligible 7 for placement under competent private instruction with prior 8 approval of the placement by the director of special education 9 of the area education agency of the childâs district of 10 residence . 11 Sec. 8. REPEAL. Sections 279.77, 279.78, 279.79, 279.80, 12 and 601.1, Code 2025, are repealed. 13